src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON TØRRE
          tørre+V+Inf:tørre  # ;
          tørre+V+Imp:tør    # ;
      tørre+V+Ind+Prs:tør    # ;
 tørre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tørres # ;
      tørre+V+Ind+Prt:torde  # ;
      tørre+V+Ind+Prt:turde  # ;
       tørre+V+PrfPtc:tort   # ;

LEXICON VEIE
             veie+V+Inf:veie    # ;
             veie+V+Imp:vei     # ;
         veie+V+Ind+Prs:veier   # ;
    veie+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:veies   # ;
         veie+V+Ind+Prt:veide   # ;
 veie+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:vog     # ;
          veie+V+PrfPtc:veid    # ;
          veie+V+PrsPtc:veiende # ;

LEXICON VELGE
          velge+V+Inf:velge    # ;
          velge+V+Imp:velg     # ;
      velge+V+Ind+Prs:velger   # ;
 velge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:velges   # ;
      velge+V+Ind+Prt:valgte   # ;
       velge+V+PrfPtc:valgt    # ;
       velge+V+PrsPtc:velgende # ;

LEXICON VEVE
          veve+V+Inf:veve    # ;
          veve+V+Imp:vev     # ;
      veve+V+Ind+Prs:vever   # ;
 veve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:veves   # ;
      veve+V+Ind+Prt:vevde   # ;
      veve+V+Ind+Prt:vov     # ;
       veve+V+PrfPtc:vevd    # ;
       veve+V+PrsPtc:vevende # ;

LEXICON VIKE
          vike+V+Inf:vike    # ;
          vike+V+Imp:vik     # ;
      vike+V+Ind+Prs:viker   # ;
 vike+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vikes   # ;
      vike+V+Ind+Prt:vek     # ;
      vike+V+Ind+Prt:veik    # ;
       vike+V+PrfPtc:veket   # ;
       vike+V+PrsPtc:vikende # ;

LEXICON VILLE
     ville+V+Inf:ville  # ;
 ville+V+Ind+Prs:vil    # ;
 ville+V+Ind+Prt:ville  # ;
  ville+V+PrfPtc:villet # ;

LEXICON VINDE
          vinde+V+Inf:vinde    # ;
          vinde+V+Imp:vind     # ;
      vinde+V+Ind+Prs:vinder   # ;
 vinde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vindes   # ;
      vinde+V+Ind+Prt:vindet   # ;
       vinde+V+PrfPtc:vindet   # ;
       vinde+V+PrsPtc:vindende # ;

LEXICON VINNE
          vinne+V+Inf:vinne    # ;
          vinne+V+Imp:vinn     # ;
      vinne+V+Ind+Prs:vinner   # ;
 vinne+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vinnes   # ;
      vinne+V+Ind+Prt:vant     # ;
       vinne+V+PrfPtc:vunnet   # ;
       vinne+V+PrsPtc:vinnende # ;

LEXICON VITE
     vite+V+Inf:vite    # ;
     vite+V+Imp:vit     # ;
 vite+V+Ind+Prs:vet     # ;
 vite+V+Ind+Prt:visste  # ;
  vite+V+PrfPtc:visst   # ;
  vite+V+PrsPtc:vitende # ;

LEXICON VRI
          vri+V+Inf:vrie    # ;
          vri+V+Imp:vri     # ;
      vri+V+Ind+Prs:vrir    # ;
 vri+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:vris    # ;
      vri+V+Ind+Prt:vridde  # ;
      vri+V+Ind+Prt:vred    # ;
      vri+V+Ind+Prt:vrei    # ;
       vri+V+PrfPtc:vridd   # ;
       vri+V+PrsPtc:vriende # ;

LEXICON VÆRE
     være+V+Inf:være     # ;
 være+V+Ind+Prs:er       # ;
 være+V+Ind+Prt:var      # ;
  være+V+PrfPtc:vært     # ;
  være+V+PrsPtc:værende  # ;
     være+V+Imp:vær      # ;
 tørre+V+PrfPtc:turt     # ;
 tørre+V+PrsPtc:tørrende # ;


LEXICON XREKKE
          rekke+V+Inf:rekke  #          ;
          rekke+V+Imp:rekk   #          ;
      rekke+V+Ind+Prs:rekker #          ;
 rekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rekkes #          ;
     rekke+V+Inf+Pass:rekkes #          ;
      rekke+V+Ind+Prt:rakk   #          ;
       rekke+V+PrfPtc:rukket #          ;
       rekke+V+PrsPtc:rekk   prfptcsuff ;
