src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
          gjen       VELGE   ;
            av       VIKE    ;
           unn       VIKE    ;
          gjen       VINNE   ;
          over       VINNE   ;
           unn       VÆRE    ;
                     XREKKE  ; ! rekke
             b       XREKKE  ;
         foret       XREKKE  ;
          fort       XREKKE  ;
        kvekke       XREKKE  ;
          over       XREKKE  ;
          radb       XREKKE  ;
            sp       XREKKE  ;
            sp       XREKKE  ;
            st       XREKKE  ;
             t       XREKKE  ;
          tilt       XREKKE  ;
